Hawaii, session 2026, HB2275.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: PART I SECTION 1.  This part is recommended by the governor for immediate passage in accordance with section 9 of article VII of the Constitution of the State of Hawaii. SECTION 2.  In prior years, the respective budget acts contained a budget proviso such as section 72 of Act 88, Session Laws of Hawaii 2021, the General Appropriations Act of 2021 (Act 88), which permitted departments to transfer funds between their programs provided that the legislature was informed of the transfers.  However, section 8 of Act 248, Session Laws of Hawaii 2022, the Supplemental Appropriations Act of 2022, repealed section 72 of Act 88, and Act 250, Session Laws of Hawaii 2025, the General Appropriations Act of 2025, did not reinstate the proviso.  Consequently, although funds were appropriated to various state departments for their operating programs for fiscal year 2025-2026, the proviso's elimination limits the ability of departments to transfer funds between their programs to address changing conditions. The purpose of this part is to adjusting funding for various programs to be commensurate with their anticipated levels of activity: (1)  Address the omission of the transfer proviso by adjusting third quarter funding for existing programs; (2)  Appropriate moneys for operations of certain state programs; and (3)  Appropriate moneys from the state management revolving fund and the mass transit special fund into the general fund. The emergency appropriations and the funding adjustment made in this part are budget neutral. SECTION 3.  Act 250, Session Laws of Hawaii 2025, is amended by amending section 3 as follows: 1.  By adding item B-5 to read: "5.  HMS802 - VOCATIONAL REHABILITATION 38.73*         38.73* 2.00#          2.00# OPERATING                         HMS       [5,056,561A]     6,138,995A 5,622,269A 73.27*         73.27* HMS       19,176,876N    19,176,876N HMS        2,000,000W    2,000,000W" 2.  By amending item F-1 to read: "1.  HMS301 - CHILD PROTECTIVE SERVICES 303.75*        303.75* OPERATING                         HMS [50,570,717A]    50,570,717A 50,870,717A 1.00*          1.00* HMS        6,124,053B     6,124,053B 84.75*         84.75* HMS       49,452,950N    49,452,950N HMS          400,000P      400,000P" 3.  By amending item F-2 to read: "2.  HMS302 - GENERAL SUPPORT FOR CHILD CARE 38.92*         38.92* OPERATING                         HMS       [2,840,528A]     2,840,528A 3,158,314A 38.08*         38.08* HMS       14,137,770N   14,137,770N" 4.  By amending item F-5 to read: "5.  HMS501 - IN-COMMUNITY YOUTH PROGRAMS 18.50*         18.50* 1.00#          1.00# OPERATING                         HMS [10,764,943A]    10,800,451A 11,969,283A 0.50*          0.50* 0.50#          0.50# HMS        2,050,000N    1,534,135N" 5.  By amending item F-8 to read: "8.  HMS601 - ADULT PROTECTIVE AND COMMUNITY SERVICES 69.48*         69.48* OPERATING                         HMS       [6,875,326A]     6,875,326A 7,644,512A 7.02*          7.02* 3.00#          3.00# HMS          838,010N       838,010N HMS           10,000R        10,000R HMS          387,560U       387,560U HMS        1,321,390P    1,321,390P" 6.  By amending item F-12 to read: "12. HMS211 - CASH SUPPORT FOR FAMILIES - SELF-SUFFICIENCY OPERATING                         HMS [26,715,965A]    26,715,965A 27,715,965A HMS       44,000,000N   44,000,000N" 7.  By amending item F-13 to read: "13. HMS220 - RENTAL HOUSING SERVICES 5.00*          5.00* OPERATING                         HMS       [4,694,409A]     4,694,409A 5,163,849A 191.00*        191.00* 4.50#          4.50# HMS      106,838,200N   112,088,200N 17.00*         17.00* HMS        5,134,715W     5,187,506W INVESTMENT CAPITAL                BED       68,000,000C             C" 8.  By amending item F-14 to read: "14. HMS229 - HAWAII PUBLIC HOUSING AUTHORITY ADMINISTRATION 2.00*          2.00* 3.00#          3.00# OPERATING                         HMS         [502,838A]       502,838A 559,092A HMS       27,864,996N    27,840,930N 119.00*        119.00* 47.00#         47.00# HMS       17,416,598W   17,676,361W" 9.  By amending item F-15 to read: "15. HMS222 - RENTAL ASSISTANCE SERVICES 1.00*          1.00* OPERATING                         HMS       [1,557,121A]     1,557,121A 1,712,833A 34.00*         34.00* 1.00#          1.00# HMS     73,368,975N      77,039,700N" 10.  By amending item F-18 to read: "18. HMS401 - HEALTH CARE PAYMENTS OPERATING                         HMS    [1,031,466,906A] 1,031,466,906A 1,048,466,906A HMS 230,000,000B     230,000,000B HMS     2,291,497,122N 2,291,497,122N HMS        6,781,921U 6,781,921U HMS       15,798,564P 15,798,564P" 11.  By amending item F-19 to read: "19. HMS236 - CASE MANAGEMENT FOR SELF-SUFFICIENCY 287.43*        287.43* OPERATING                         HMS [19,875,373A]    19,673,479A 22,098,949A 226.57*        226.57* HMS       26,545,359N    26,393,053N HMS           30,237P       30,237P" 12.  By amending item F-22 to read: "22. HMS237 - EMPLOYMENT AND TRAINING OPERATING                         HMS         [469,505A]       469,505A 522,031A HMS        2,575,945N    2,575,945N" 13.  By amending item F-27 to read: "27. HMS902 - GENERAL SUPPORT FOR HEALTH CARE PAYMENTS 137.00*        137.00* 4.50#          4.50# OPERATING                         HMS       [16,133,771A]   16,133,771A 17,938,753A 0.87*          0.87* HMS       30,104,367B    30,104,367B 145.63*        145.63* 16.50#         16.50# HMS       96,345,000N    96,345,000N HMS        1,200,000P    1,200,000P" 14.  By amending item F-28 to read: "28. HMS903 - GENERAL SUPPORT FOR SELF-SUFFICIENCY SERVICES 51.30*         51.30* OPERATING                         HMS [48,609,196A]    48,604,950A 21,896,226A 46.70*         46.70* HMS       95,422,009N    95,418,155N HMS       19,560,000P   19,560,000P" 15.  By amending item F-29 to read: "29. HMS904 - GENERAL ADMINISTRATION - DHS 151.59*        151.59* 8.00#          5.00# OPERATING                         HMS [18,703,261A]    14,292,045A 18,777,503A 31.41*         31.41* 6.00#              # HMS       17,288,921N     4,788,768N INVESTMENT CAPITAL                HMS       10,000,000C             C" 16.  By amending item F-30 to read: "30. HMS901 - GENERAL SUPPORT FOR SOCIAL SERVICES 33.50*         33.50* OPERATING                         HMS       [4,287,230A]     3,487,230A 4,766,868A 9.50*          9.50* HMS        3,246,986N    3,246,986N" 17.  By amending item F-31 to read: "31. HMS777 - OFFICE ON HOMELESSNESS AND HOUSING SOLUTIONS 8.00*          8.00* OPERATING                         HMS         [611,040A]       611,040A 679,400A INVESTMENT CAPITAL                HMS       24,400,000C   13,000,000C" 18.  By amending item F-32 to read: "32. HMS555 - OFFICE OF WELLNESS AND RESILIENCE 12.00*         12.00* OPERATING                         HMS       [1,346,000A]    1,346,000A" 1,496,584A 19.  By amending item I-4 to read: "4.  PSD405 - HAWAII COMMUNITY CORRECTIONAL CENTER 193.00*        193.00* OPERATING                         PSD     [15,855,815A]   15,855,815A" 18,455,815A 20.  By amending item I-9 to read: "9.  PSD410 - INTAKE SERVICE CENTERS 73.00*         73.00* OPERATING                         PSD       [5,891,809A]    5,891,809A" 4,891,809A 21.  By amending item I-13 to read: "13. PSD808 - NON-STATE FACILITIES 9.00*          9.00* OPERATING                         PSD [42,589,908A]   42,589,908A" 40,989,908A 22.  By amending item J-16 to read: "16. HMS888 - COMMISSION ON THE STATUS OF WOMEN 1.00*          1.00* 1.00#          1.00# OPERATING                         HMS          [184,462A]     184,462A" 205,098A PART II SECTION 4.  The purpose of this part is to appropriate moneys to various entities to offset operational costs. SECTION 5.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $          or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for operations of the agribusiness development corporation. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the agribusiness development corporation for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 6.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $          or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for operations of the Hawaii technology development corporation. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the Hawaii technology development corporation for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 7.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $          or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for operations of the school facilities authority. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the school facilities authority for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 8.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $          or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for operations of the Hawaii community development authority. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the Hawaii community development authority for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 9.  There is appropriated out of the mass transit special fund the sum of $          or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for making disbursements pursuant to section 248-2.7, Hawaii Revised Statutes. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of budget and finance for the purposes of the mass transit special fund. PART III SECTION 10.  The purpose of this part is to lapse excess moneys to the credit of the general fund. SECTION 11.  The legislature determines that there is $          in excess of the requirements of the state risk management revolving fund for fiscal year 2025-2026.  Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the director of finance may transfer $          or so much as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for deposit into the general fund. PART IV SECTION 12.  The purpose of this part is to appropriate moneys into and out of the major disaster fund to address flood disaster recovery and response costs. SECTION 13.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $175,000,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for deposit into the major disaster fund established pursuant to section 127A-16, Hawaii Revised Statutes. SECTION 14.  There is appropriated out of the major disaster fund the sum of $175,000,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 to address flood disaster recovery and response costs. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the Hawaii emergency management agency for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 15.  Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the governor may authorize the transfer of up to $175,000,000 in funds appropriated out of the major disaster fund pursuant to this part to other state agencies to address flood disaster recovery costs; provided that the governor, in a written determination, specifically finds that the reallocation or use of the moneys transferred is essential to address an imminent threat to public health, safety, or welfare arising from the emergency; provided further that the governor shall transmit a written notice of that determination, including a detailed justification, to the legislature within five days of each use of this authority, or as soon as practicable under exigent circumstances; and provided further that the written determination shall include the date of transfer, the amount of the transfer, the program ID of the program to which the funds were transferred, and an explanation of the purpose of the transfer of resources; and provided further that any funds relating to this part not expended for this purpose shall lapse to the general fund on June 30, 2027. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the governor shall submit to the legislature, no later than thirty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2027, a summary report containing the aforementioned information for each use of this authority for the previous twelve-month period from December 1 to November 30. Any reallocation or use of funds pursuant to this part shall be limited in scope and duration to that which is strictly necessary to address the emergency and shall terminate upon the ending of the emergency or upon legislative action. PART V SECTION 16.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 17.  This Act shall take effect as follows: (1)  Part I shall take effect upon approval; (2)  Parts II and IV shall take effect on July 1, 2026; and (3)  Part III shall take effect on June 30, 2026.